Illinois, session 104th, SB4105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses for the Department of the 9Lottery, including operating expenses related to Multi-State 10Lottery games pursuant to the Illinois Lottery Law:11PAYABLE FROM STATE LOTTERY FUND12  For Personal Services.............................7,100,00013  For State Contributions for the State14   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,100,00015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security....................................543,00017  For Group Insurance...............................2,650,00018  For Contractual Services..........................6,000,00019  For Travel...........................................50,00020  For Commodities......................................40,00021  For Printing.........................................75,00022  For Equipment........................................12,00023  For Electronic Data Processing....................5,130,000  SB4105- 2 -OMB104 00197 JTR 10197 b1  For Telecommunications Services.....................350,0002  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................650,0003  For Refunds.........................................100,0004  For Expenses of Developing and5   Promoting Lottery Games........................272,550,0006  For Expenses of the Lottery Board.....................5,0007  For payment of prizes to holders of winning8   lottery tickets or shares, including prizes9   related to Multi-State Lottery games, and10   payment of promotional or incentive prizes11   associated with the sale of lottery12   tickets, pursuant to the provisions of the13   Illinois Lottery Law.........................3,000,000,00014    Total                                      $3,298,355,000 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.